it: Elettronica > Audio > Audio per DJ e specialisti: Accessori DJ e audio specializzato; Cabine e facciate DJ; Lettori CD DJ; Controller DJ; Mixer DJ; Rack e flight case DJ; Supporti e tavoli DJ; Sistemi per DJ
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > DJ và âm thanh chuyên dụng: Phụ kiện âm thanh chuyên biệt và DJ; Buồng và gian DJ; Máy chơi CD trộn nhạc; Bộ điều khiển DJ; Bàn trộn DJ; Giá và vỏ chứa DJ; Bàn và giá DJ; Các hệ thống trộn nhạc
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > DJ e especialidade áudio: Acessórios para DJ e áudio especializado; Cabines e fachadas para DJ; Leitores DJ CD; Controladores para DJ; Misturadores para DJ; Racks e caixas de transporte para DJ; Suportes e mesas para DJ; Sistemas DJ
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > DJ og spesiallyd: DJ- og spesiallydtilbehør; DJ-boder og -fasader; CD-spillere for DJ-bruk; DJ-kontrollere; DJ-miksere; DJ-rackskap og -transportkasser; DJ-stativ og -bord; DJ-systemer
en: Electronics > Audio > DJ & Specialty Audio: DJ & Specialty Audio Accessories; DJ Booths & Facades; DJ CD Players; DJ Controllers; DJ Mixers; DJ Racks & Road Cases; DJ Stands & Tables; DJ Systems
de: Elektronik > Audio > DJ- & Spezialaudiogeräte: DJ- und Spezial-Audio-Zubehör; DJ-Kabinen und -Fassaden; DJ CD-Player; DJ-Controller; DJ-Mischpulte; DJ-Racks und -Flightcases; DJ-Ständer und -Tische; DJ Systeme
hu: Elektronika > Hang > DJ és speciális hang: DJ- és speciális audio-kiegészítők; DJ-kabinok és homlokzatok; DJ CD-lejátszók; DJ-kontrollerek; DJ-keverők; DJ-tartók és úttokok; DJ-állványok és -asztalok; DJ-rendszerek
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Специално DJ оборудване: DJ и специализирани аудио аксесоари; DJ кабини и фасади; DJ CD-плейъри; DJ контролери; DJ миксери; DJ стелажи и пътни куфари; DJ стойки и маси; DJ системи
da: Elektronik > Lyd > DJ- og speciallyd: DJ- og speciallydstilbehør; DJ-båse og -facader; DJ cd-afspillere; DJ-controllere; DJ-mixerpulte; DJ-stativer og -rejsekasser; DJ-stativer og -borde; DJ-systemer
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Audio voor DJ's en speciaal gebruik: DJ en speciale audio accessoires; DJ-booths en facades; CD-spelers voor DJ's; DJ-controllers; DJ-mixers; DJ-racks en flightcases; DJ-standaards en tafels; DJ-systemen
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Профессиональное диджейское оборудование: Аксессуары для профессионального DJ-оборудования; DJ-кабины и фасады; Диджейские CD-проигрыватели; DJ-контроллеры; DJ-микшеры; Рэковые стойки и кейсы для DJ-оборудования; DJ-стойки и столы; DJ-системы
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > DJ ir specializuota garso įranga: Dj ir specializuoti garso aksesuarai; DJ būdelės  ir fasadai; DJ CD grotuvai; DJ valdikliai; DJ maišytuvai; DJ stovai ir kelioninės dėžės; DJ stovai ir pultai; DJ sistemos
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > DJ และระบบเสียงพิเศษ: อุปกรณ์เสริมดีเจและเสียงเฉพาะทาง; บูธและหน้าบังดีเจ; เครื่องเล่น CD ของ DJ; คอนโทรลเลอร์ดีเจ; มิกเซอร์ดีเจ; แร็คและกระเป๋าเดินทางดีเจ; ขาตั้งและโต๊ะดีเจ; ระบบ DJ
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > DJ用特殊オーディオ: DJ・特殊オーディオアクセサリー; DJブース・ファサード; DJ用CDプレーヤー; DJコントローラー; DJミキサー; DJラック・ロードケース; DJスタンド・テーブル; DJシステム
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Speciální zvukové vybavení a DJ: DJ a speciální audio příslušenství; DJ paravány a zástěny; Přehrávače CD pro DJ; DJ kontrolery; DJ mixážní pulty; DJ racky a přepravní kufry; DJ stojany a stoly; DJ systémy
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > DJ 專業音樂設備: DJ 及特殊音訊配件; DJ 展台及門面; DJ CD 播放器; DJ 控制器; DJ 混音器; DJ 機架及運輸箱; DJ 架及桌; DJ 系統
es: Electrónica > Audio > DJ y audio especializado: Accesorios de DJ y audio especializado; Cabinas y fachadas de DJ; Reproductores de CD para DJ; Controladores de DJ; Mezcladores de DJ; Racks y estuches de transporte de DJ; Soportes y mesas de DJ; Sistemas DJ
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Équipement de DJ: Accessoires audio DJ et spécialisés; Cabines et façades de DJ; Lecteurs CD de DJ; Contrôleurs DJ; Tables de mixage DJ; Racks et flight cases DJ; Supports et tables DJ; Systèmes DJ
tr: Elektronik > Ses > DJ ve Uzman Ses Sistemleri: DJ ve Özel Ses Aksesuarları; DJ Kabinleri ve Cepheler; DJ CD Çalarları; DJ Kontrollerleri; DJ Mikserler; DJ Rafları ve Yol Çantaları; DJ Stantları ve Masaları; DJ Sistemleri
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > DJ & Εξειδικευμένος Ήχος: Αξεσουάρ DJ & ειδικού ήχου; Θάλαμοι & προσόψεις DJ; CD Players για DJs; Ελεγκτές DJ; Μίκτες DJ; Ράφια & θήκες μεταφοράς DJ; Βάσεις & τραπέζια DJ; Συστήματα για DJs
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > DJ a špeciálna audio technika: DJ a špeciálne audio príslušenstvo; DJ stánky a fasády; DJ CD prehrávače; DJ kontrol éry; DJ mixéry; DJ racky a cestovné kufre; DJ stojany a stoly; DJ systémy
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > DJ-ji in posebni avdio aparati: DJ in specializirani avdio dodatki; DJ kabine in fasade; DJ CD predvajalniki; DJ krmilniki; DJ mešalniki; DJ stojala in transportni kovčki; DJ stojala in mize; DJ sistemi
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Posebna i DJ audiooprema: Dodatci za DJ i posebnu opremu; DJ kabine i fasade; Uređaj za reprodukciju CD-ova za DJ-a; DJ kontroleri; DJ mikseri; DJ stalci i putni koferi; DJ stolovi; Sustavi za DJ-a
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > DJ- ja ammattilaisaudio: DJ- ja erikoisaudiolaitteen lisävaruste; DJ-miksauspöytä ja julkisivu; DJ-CD-soittimet; DJ-kontrolleri; DJ-mikseri; DJ-teline ja kuljetuslaukku; DJ-teline ja pöytä; DJ-järjestelmät
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > DJ- och specialistljud: Tillbehör till dj och specialljud; Dj-bås och fasader; CD-spelare för DJ:s; Dj-kontroller; Dj-mixers; Dj-rack och roadcase; Dj-stativ och bord; DJ-system
ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Componente audio DJ și de specialitate: Accesorii pentru DJ și audio specializat; Cabine și fațade pentru DJ; CD playere pentru DJ; Controlere DJ; Mixere DJ; Rackuri și cutii de transport pentru DJ; Standuri și mese pentru DJ; Sisteme pentru DJ
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Equipamentos de áudio para DJ: Acessórios para DJ e áudio especializado; Cabines e fachadas para DJ; CD players para DJ; Controladores de DJ; Mixers de DJ; Racks e cases de transporte para DJ; Suportes e mesas para DJ; Sistemas para DJ
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > DJ与专业音频: DJ 与专业音频配件; DJ 台和台体面板; DJ CD播放机; DJ 控制器; DJ 混音台; DJ 机架和航空箱; DJ 支架和工作台; DJ系统
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > DJ/특수 오디오: DJ 및 전문 오디오 액세서리; DJ 부스 및 파사드; DJ CD 플레이어; DJ 컨트롤러; DJ 믹서; DJ 랙 및 로드 케이스; DJ 스탠드 및 테이블; DJ 시스템
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Audio dla DJ-ów i specjalistyczne: Akcesoria DJ-a i audio specjalistyczne; Budki i fasady DJ-a; Odtwarzacze CD dla DJ-ów; Kontrolery DJ-a; Miksery DJ-a; Stojaki i walizki DJ-a; Stojaki i stoły DJ-a; Systemy dla DJ-ów